California statutes. Education Code
Whenever the principal and interest on bonds issued by the authority to finance the cost of a project or working capital, or to refinance the outstanding indebtedness of one or more participating parties, including any refunding bonds issued to refund and refinance those bonds, have been fully paid or retired, or whenever adequate provision has been made to fully pay and retire the bonds, and all other conditions of the resolution, lease, trust indenture and any security interest, or any other instrument or instruments authorizing and securing the bonds have been satisfied and the lien of security interest has been released in accordance with those provisions, the authority shall promptly provide for and execute any releases, release deeds, reassignments, deeds, and conveyances as are necessary and required to convey or release its rights, title, and interest in the project financed, to the participating parties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 325, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

17196.

(a) This chapter shall be deemed to provide a complete, additional, and alternative method for accomplishing the acts authorized in this chapter, and shall be deemed as being supplemental and additional to the powers conferred by other applicable laws, except that the issuance of revenue bonds and refunding bonds and the undertaking or projects or financings under this chapter need not comply with the requirements of any other laws applicable to the issuance of bonds, including, without limitation, Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (a), the financing of a project under this chapter shall not exempt a project from any of the requirements of law which are otherwise applicable to the project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17197.

To the extent that the provisions of this chapter are inconsistent with any other provisions of any general statute, or a special act or parts thereof, the provisions of this chapter shall be deemed controlling.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17198.

Any net earnings of the authority beyond that necessary for the retirement of any obligations issued by the authority, or to implement the purposes of this chapter, may inure only to the benefit of the State of California or the authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17199.

Upon the dissolution of the authority, title to all property owned by the authority shall vest in the successor authority created by the Legislature, if any, if the successor authority meets the requirements of Section 103 of the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1954, as amended, and its implementing regulations, as an authority entitled to issue obligations on behalf of the State of California, the interest from which is exempted from federal income taxation.

In the event that a successor authority is not created, title to all property owned by the authority shall vest in the State of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17199.1.

(a) Any participating party, exclusively for the purpose of securing financing or refinancing of projects or working capital pursuant to this chapter through the issuance, by the authority, of revenue bonds, certificates of participation, or other means, and notwithstanding any other law, may do any of the following:

(1) Sell to
 the authority all or part of any rights to or possibilities regarding the state’s share of funding for school facilities approved by the State Allocation Board pursuant to Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Sec. 17070.10), including amounts apportioned and funded and amounts approved but not yet funded by the State Allocation Board from proceeds of state bonds already authorized by the electors but not yet issued.

(2) Issue bonds to the authority.

(3) Borrow money or purchase or lease educational facilities from the authority, and in connection with the borrowing, purchase, or lease, sell or lease property to the authority, in each case at any interest rate or rates, rental provisions, with any maturity date or dates or term, and with any other transfer, assignment, payment, security, default, remedy, and other terms or provisions as may be specified in the sale of rights agreement or the bonds of the participating party or a loan, loan purchase, installment sale, lease, or other agreement between the authority and the participating party, subject to the following conditions:

(A) (i) The sum of the amount borrowed to finance or refinance working capital and the interest payable on the working capital assumed at the initial interest rate if interest is variable, shall not exceed 85 percent of the estimated amount of uncollected taxes, income, revenue, cash receipts, and other funds to be
 received by the participating party, which:

(I) In the case of a school district, community college district, or county office of education, will be available in the fiscal year of the
 borrowing.

(II) In the case of a charter school, will be available during the term of the loan, for the repayment of the loan and the interest
 on the loan.

(ii) For purposes of this paragraph, “revenue” includes, but is not limited to, federal and state funds received by the participating party.

(B) In computing the maximum amount that may be borrowed pursuant to subparagraph (A), the participating party may exclude the amount of any principal or interest
 that is secured by a pledge of the amount in any inactive or term deposit of the participating party that has a term scheduled to terminate:

(i) In the case of a school district, community college district, or county office of education, during the fiscal year of the borrowing.

(ii) In the case of a charter school, during the term of the loan.

(C) A participating party that borrows money to finance or refinance working capital pursuant to this subdivision shall be required to repay and discharge the loan, including interest, within 15 months of the loan date.

(D) In enacting this chapter, it is the intent of the Legislature to provide financing or refinancing of working capital needed to cover temporary or cashflow deficits and needs for working capital and not long-term budget deficits or shortfalls in funding. The participating party must demonstrate to
 the satisfaction of the authority that, during the term of any working capital loan received pursuant to this chapter, the participating party will receive or otherwise have (without additional borrowing) sufficient funds to repay and discharge the loan. The participating party may take into account all funds received by the participating party and may base future projections upon historical experience or reasonable expectations, or a combination of both.

(b) Notwithstanding Sections 700, 703, and 1045 of the Civil Code, the rights and possibilities that a participating party may have or obtain in the future to an approved state contribution to funding for school facilities pursuant to Chapter 12.5 (commencing with
 Section 17070.10) that remains unfunded pending the issuance of state bonds already authorized by the electors shall constitute property for all purposes and may be transferred as provided in subdivision (a). In the case of any transfer or assignment of rights or possibilities relating to funds for which bonds have been approved by the voters but are not yet available, the transfer or assignment shall be approved by resolution of the State Allocation Board
 before becoming effective.

(c) Any participating party may enter into any agreement for liquidity or credit enhancement, with any reimbursement, payment, interest, security, default, remedy, and other terms it may deem necessary or appropriate in connection with the issuance of bonds, the borrowing of money, or the lease or purchase of educational facilities, whichever is applicable. Any participating party or parties also may do all things and execute all documents as may be necessary or desirable in connection with the issuance of certificates of participation, or other interests, in any bond, loan,
 note, installment sale, lease, or other agreement of the participating party.

(d) A school district, by resolution, may
 authorize any county or city board of education or superintendent of schools, a community college district, by resolution, may authorize the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges or the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, and a charter school, by resolution, may authorize its chartering entity or educational management organization, to act as its agent in the
 performance of any of the matters permitted by this section or any other provision of this chapter. Notwithstanding any other law, the agent shall have the powers granted by the resolution for purposes of this chapter. The resolution shall be deemed to bind the school district, charter school, or community college district, as the case may be, to any contract, agreement, instrument, or other document executed by the agent on behalf of the school district, charter school, or community college district, and all duties, obligations, or responsibilities contained in the contract, agreement, instrument, or other document on the part of the school district, charter school, or community college district, to the same extent
 as if duly authorized, executed, and delivered by the school district, charter school, or community college district.

(e) This section shall be deemed to provide a complete, additional, and alternative method for accomplishing the acts authorized by this section, and the sale or transfer of any rights to or possibilities regarding the state share of funding for school facilities approved by the State Allocation Board, including amounts apportioned and funded and amounts approved but not yet funded from proceeds of state bonds already authorized by the electors but not yet issued, issuance of bonds to, borrowing of money from, or sale or purchase or lease of educational facilities from or to, the authority. Any agreement entered into in connection with the transfer of any rights to or possibilities regarding the state contribution for
 funding for school facilities pursuant to Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 17070.10), including amounts apportioned and funded and amounts approved but not yet funded by the State Allocation Board from proceeds of state bonds already authorized by the electors but not yet issued, or the issuance of bonds, the borrowing of money, or the sale, purchase, or lease of educational facilities, including, without limitation, any agreement for liquidity or credit enhancement under this section, need not comply with the requirements of any other law applicable to issuance of bonds, borrowing, selling, purchasing, leasing, pledge, encumbrance, or credit, as the case may be, by a school district, charter school, or community college district, or by a county or city board of education or superintendent of schools, or the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges or Chancellor of the California
 Community Colleges, or the governing board of a charter school, chartering entity, or educational management organization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 38, Sec. 34.   (SB 1016)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

17199.15.

Notwithstanding any other law, if any bonds that were issued for purposes of borrowing pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 17199.1 to fund several financings of working capital for several participating parties under a single resolution remain outstanding, each participating party for which those bonds were issued is ineligible to be a debtor in a case under Chapter 9 of the United States Bankruptcy Code (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 901) of Title 11 of the United States Code), as that chapter may be amended from time to time, and no governmental officer or organization is or may be empowered to authorize a participating party to be a debtor under that chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 110, Sec. 5.   (SB 820)   Effective September 18, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

17199.2.

An action may be commenced under Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 860) of Title 10 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure to determine the validity of any issuance or proposed issuance of revenue bonds, the loan of the proceeds thereof, the sale, purchase, or lease of facilities under this chapter, or the legality and validity of any proceedings previously taken or proposed in a resolution of the authority to be taken for the authorization, issuance, sale, and delivery of the bonds, for the use of the proceeds thereof, or for the payment of the principal and interest thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17199.3.

(a) The total amount of revenue bonds that may be issued and outstanding at any time for purposes of this chapter shall not exceed four billion four hundred million dollars ($4,400,000,000).

(b) For purposes of subdivision (a) bonds that meet any of the following conditions shall not be deemed to be outstanding:

(1) Bonds that have been refunded pursuant to Section 17188.

(2) Bonds for which money or securities in amounts necessary to pay or redeem the principal, interest, or any redemption premium on the bonds have been deposited in trust.

(3) Bonds that have been issued to finance or refinance working capital.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 416, Sec. 3.   (AB 1979)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

17199.4.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, any participating party, in connection with securing financing or refinancing of projects, or working capital pursuant to this chapter, may, in accordance with this section, elect to provide for funding, in whole or in part, one or more of the following:

(1) Payments on authority bonds.

(2) Payments under credit enhancement or liquidity support agreements in connection with authority bonds.

(3) Amounts pledged or assigned under one or more pledges or assignments to pay authority bonds or obligations under these credit enhancement or liquidity support agreements.

(4) Payments to fund reserves available to pay any of the payments described in paragraphs (1), (2), and (3), exclusively until paid.

(5) Fees and charges contemplated by the instruments of the authority, trustees, tender agents, remarketing agents, credit enhancement and liquidity support providers, and service providers.

(6) Any other costs necessary or incidental to any financing or refinancing conducted under this chapter.

(b) The payments made pursuant to subdivision (a) may be in connection with a financing or refinancing benefiting the participating party itself, one or more other participating parties, or any combination of participating parties.

(c) To participate under this section,
 the participating party shall do all of the following:

(1) Elect to participate in a state intercept or local intercept, or both, by an action of its governing board taken in compliance with the rules of that board. For a local intercept, the participating party shall send to the county treasurer, or other appropriate county fiscal officer, a request for the county to participate. A county is not required to participate. A county may agree to participate as evidenced by an agreement among the participating party or parties, the county, and the authority.

(2) Provide written notice to the Controller, with respect to a state intercept, or to the county treasurer or other appropriate county fiscal officer, with respect to a local intercept, no later than the date of the issuance of the bonds or 60 days before the next payment, whichever is later, of all of the following:

(A) Its election to participate.

(B) A schedule of the payments subject to that election.

(C) The payee or payees of those payments, or the trustee or agent on their behalf to receive those payments.

(D) (i) Payment delivery instructions, which may be by wire transfer or other method approved by the Controller or county treasurer or other appropriate county fiscal officer, as applicable.

(ii) If the method of payment delivery is wire transfer, the participating party shall complete and submit the appropriate authorization form as prescribed by the Controller or the county treasurer or other appropriate county fiscal officer, as applicable.

(d) The participating party may amend, supplement, or restate the notice required pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) for any reason, including, but not necessarily limited to, providing for new or increased payments. The participating party shall certify in the notice and in any amendment, supplement, or restatement of the notice that each and every payment reflected in the schedule is a payment described in subdivision (a) and the amounts scheduled do not exceed the actual or reasonably estimated payment obligations to be funded pursuant to this section. The participating party shall also represent in the notice that it is not submitting the notice for the purpose of accelerating a participating party’s receipt of its apportionments. This section does not prohibit transfer by the recipient of an apportionment under this section to the participating party submitting the notice of the excess apportionment above the amount needed to fund
 actual payments where the excess resulted from erroneous estimation of scheduled payments or otherwise.

(e) Upon receipt of the notice required by paragraph (2) of subdivision (c), the Controller shall make an apportionment to the indicated recipient on the date, or during the period, shown in the schedule in accordance with all of the following:

(1) If the participating party requests transfers in full as scheduled, in the amount of the scheduled transfer or whatever lesser amount is available from the sources described in subdivision (f).

(2) If the participating party does not request transfers in full as scheduled, in the amount of the anticipated deficiency for the purpose of making the required payment indicated in a written request of the participating party to the Controller and in the amount of the actual
 shortfall in payment indicated in a written request of the recipient or the participating party to the Controller or whatever lesser amount is available from the sources described in subdivision (f).

(3) To the extent funds available for an apportionment are insufficient to pay the amount set forth in a schedule in any period, the Controller shall, if and as requested in the notice, reschedule the payment of all or a portion of the deficiency to a subsequent period.

(4) In making apportionments under this section, the Controller may rely conclusively and without liability on any notice or request delivered under this section, including any notice of request delivered before January 1, 2015. The Controller may make, but is not obligated to make, apportionments not reflected on a notice or on an amended, supplemented, or restated notice delivered under this section that the
 Controller receives less than 20 days before when the apportionment would otherwise be required.

(f) The Controller shall make an apportionment under this section only from moneys designated for apportionment to the participating party delivering the notice, and only from one or more of the following:

(1) Any funding apportioned by the state for purposes of the local control funding formula pursuant to Section 42238.02, as implemented by Section 42238.03, or state categorical or grant programs, to a school district or county office of education without regard to the specific funding source of the apportionment.

(2) Any funding apportioned by the state for purposes of the local control funding formula pursuant to Section 42238.02, as implemented by Section 42238.03, or state categorical or grant programs, to a charter
 school without regard to the specific funding source of the apportionment.

(3) Any funding apportioned by the state for purposes of community college apportionments pursuant to Sections 84750.4 and 84750.5, or state categorical or grant programs, to a community college district without regard to the specific funding source of the apportionment.

(g) Upon receipt of the notice required by paragraph (2) of subdivision (c), a county treasurer or other appropriate county fiscal officer shall make an apportionment or revenue transfer to the indicated recipient on the date, or during the period, shown in the schedule in accordance with all of the following:

(1) If the participating party requests transfers in full as scheduled, in the amount of the scheduled transfer or whatever lesser amount is available from the sources
 described in subdivision (h).

(2) If the participating party does not request transfers in full as scheduled, in the amount of the anticipated deficiency for the purpose of making the required payment indicated in a written request of the participating party to the county treasurer or other appropriate county fiscal officer and in the amount of the actual shortfall in payment indicated in a written request of the recipient or the participating party to the county treasurer or other appropriate county fiscal officer or whatever lesser amount is available from the sources described in subdivision (h).

(3) To the extent funds available for an apportionment or revenue transfer are insufficient to pay the amount set forth in a schedule in any period, the county treasurer or other appropriate county fiscal officer shall, if and as requested in the notice, reschedule the payment of all
 or a portion of the deficiency to a subsequent period.

(4) In making apportionments under this section, the county treasurer or other appropriate county fiscal officer may rely conclusively and without liability on any notice or request delivered under this section. The county treasurer or other appropriate county fiscal officer may make, but is not obligated to make, apportionments or revenue transfers not reflected on a notice or on an amended, supplemented, or restated notice delivered under this section that the county treasurer or other appropriate county fiscal officer receives less than 20 days before when the apportionment would otherwise be required.

(h) The county treasurer or other appropriate county fiscal officer shall make an apportionment or revenue transfer under this section only from moneys designated for apportionment to the participating party delivering the
 notice, and only from one or more of the following:

(1) Any funding apportioned or administered by a county for purposes of the local control funding formula pursuant to Section 42238.02, as implemented by Section 42238.03, to a school district or county office of education without regard to the specific funding source of the apportionment.

(2) Any funding apportioned or administered by a county for purposes of the local control funding formula pursuant to Section 42238.02, as implemented by Section 42238.03, to a charter school without regard to the specific funding source of the apportionment.

(3) Any funding apportioned or administered by a county for purposes of community college apportionments pursuant to Sections 84750.4 and 84750.5 to a community college district without regard to the specific funding source
 of the apportionment.

(i) (1) The amount apportioned for a participating party pursuant to this section shall be deemed to be an allocation to the participating party, and shall be included in the computation of allocation, limit, entitlement, or apportionment for the participating party.

(2) The participating party and its creditors do not have a claim to funds apportioned or anticipated to be apportioned by the Controller or the county treasurer or appropriate county fiscal officer, as applicable, pursuant to this section.

(j) (1) The authority may require participation under this section under the terms of any financing or refinancing under this chapter to provide for one or more of the payments described in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (a). The
 authority may impose limits on new participation under this section. The authority may require participating parties to apply to the authority for participation. If the authority limits participation under this section, the authority shall consider each of the following priorities in making participation available:

(A) First priority shall be given to participating parties that apply for funding for instructional classroom space under this chapter.

(B) Second priority shall be given to participating parties that apply for funding of modernization of instructional classroom space under this chapter.

(C) Third priority shall be given to participating parties that apply for funding under this chapter for any other eligible costs, as defined in Section 17173.

(2) The authority shall prioritize applications at appropriate intervals.

(3) A school district electing to participate under this section that has applied for revenue bond moneys for purposes of joint venture school facilities construction projects, pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 17060) of Chapter 12, shall not be subject to the priorities set forth in paragraph (1).

(k) This section does not make the State of California liable for any payments within the meaning of Section 1 of Article XVI of the California Constitution.

 (l) A school district that has a qualified or negative certification pursuant to Section 42131, or a county office of education that has a qualified or negative certification pursuant to Section 1240, may only participate under this section to intercept payments
 for indebtedness for which the repayment is determined to be probable pursuant to Section 42133.

(m) This section does not obligate the State of California to make available the sources of apportionment under subdivision (f) or a county to make available the sources of apportionment under subdivision (h) in any amount or at any time or, except as provided in this section, to fund any payment described in this section. This subdivision is intended solely to clarify existing law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 48, Sec. 13.   (SB 114)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

17199.5.

Notwithstanding Section 17199.4, if the bonds were subject to a credit enhancement agreement provided by a public credit provider pursuant to Section 17193.5 for which a payment for principal or interest, or both, has been made by the public credit provider, the Controller, or the county treasurer or other appropriate county fiscal officer, as applicable, shall allocate to the public credit provider, rather than the trustee, the percentage of the apportionment to be made pursuant to this paragraph equal to the percentage of the outstanding indebtedness that is subject to the credit enhancement agreement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 48, Sec. 14.   (SB 114)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

17199.6.

The authority is delegated exclusive control over the use and allocation of the volume cap described in Section 142(k) of the federal Internal Revenue Code, or successor provisions of the Internal Revenue Code. The board of the authority, by resolution, may use the volume cap for obligations issued by the authority or allocate the volume cap to any party.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 38, Sec. 37.   (SB 1016)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 18.5. Higher Education Student Housing and Capacity Expansion Grant Programs [17200. - 17204.]

17200.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Administering entity” means the following:

(1) For an application for a community college campus or district, the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges.

(2) For an application for a California State University campus, the office of the Chancellor of the California State University.

(3) For an application for a University of California campus, the office of the President of the University of California.

(4) For an intersegmental application, both or all of the systemwide offices described in paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, as applicable to the project applicants.

(b) “Applicant” means a community college district, a campus of the California State University, a campus of the University of California, which may include the college named in Section 92200, or a partnership of campuses across and within the public higher education segments. “Applicant” also means the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges on behalf of one or more community college districts, the office of the Chancellor of the California State University on behalf of one or more campuses of the California State University, or the office of the President of the University of California on behalf of one or more campuses of the University of California.

(c) “Campus” means a community
 college district, a campus of the California State University, or a campus of the University of California, which may include the college named in Section 92200.

(d) “Capacity expansion projects” means projects that expand the ability of a four-year public postsecondary educational institution to support future California resident enrollment growth.

(e) “Low-income student” means either of the following:

(1) A student who is eligible to receive one or more of the following:

(A) Pell Grant financial aid under the federal Pell Grant program (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1070a).

(B) A Cal Grant under Chapter 1.7 (commencing with Section 69430) of Part 42 of Division 5 of Title 3.

(C) An exemption from paying nonresident tuition pursuant to Section 68130.5 provided that the student also meets income criteria applicable to the California Dream Act application.

(D) A fee waiver from a California Community College pursuant to Section 76300.

(2) A graduate student with income and asset levels that would qualify for one or more of the benefits in subparagraphs (A) through (D), inclusive, as determined by the campus at which the student is enrolled.

(f) “Public-private partnership” means a long-term agreement between a segment and the private sector for purposes of a student housing project, including, but not limited to, studying, planning, designing, constructing, developing, financing, operating, maintaining, or any combination
 thereof, a student housing project.

(g) “Segment” means the public higher education segments of California, which are the University of California, the California State University, or the California Community Colleges.

(h) “Student housing project” means one or more housing facilities to be occupied by students of one or more campuses. These facilities may include, but are not necessarily limited to, dining, academic and student support service spaces, basic needs centers, student health care services, and other necessary and usual attendant and related facilities and equipment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 478, Sec. 4.   (AB 1936)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

17201.

(a) The Higher Education Student Housing Grant Program is hereby established to provide one-time grants for the construction of student housing, or for the acquisition and renovation of commercial properties into student housing for the purpose of providing affordable, low-cost housing options for students enrolled in public postsecondary education in California.

(b) (1) (A) Of the total amount appropriated pursuant to subdivision (l), and intended to be appropriated pursuant to subdivision (p) in support of this section and Section 17202, as those sections read on January 1, 2023, 50 percent of the available funds shall be available for the California Community Colleges, 30 percent of the available funds shall be
 available for the California State University, and 20 percent of the available funds shall be available for the University of California.

(B) Commencing with the 2023–24 fiscal year, funding previously allocated for construction grants for campuses of the University of California and the California State University, or funding that is planned to be allocated for additional construction grants for the University of California and the California State University, pursuant to this section, as it read on January 1, 2023, shall be funded with bonds issued by the University of California and the California State University instead of funded from previous and planned General Fund appropriations.

(C) Commencing with the 2023–24 fiscal year, funding previously allocated for construction grants for campuses of the California Community Colleges, or funding that is planned to be allocated for
 additional construction grants for the California Community Colleges, pursuant to this section, as it read on January 1, 2023, shall be funded with local revenue bonds issued by community college districts instead of funded from previous and planned General Fund appropriations.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the amounts designated in paragraph (1) for the California Community Colleges, and the amounts designated in subdivision (n) for the University of California and the California State University, may be adjusted to accommodate and prioritize projects serving low-income students across more than one segment.

(3) It is the intent of the Legislature that grants will be disbursed to increase the current stock of affordable student housing, for purposes of supporting low-income students and facilitating low-income student access to higher education.

(c) Proposals for one-time grants for the construction of, or rehabilitation of commercial properties for, student housing shall include, at a minimum, the project goals, costs, number of students to be housed, timeline for the project, financial feasibility of the project, anticipated impact on the campus’ ability to accommodate California resident enrollment growth, a commitment to construct the project within the resource needs identified in the proposal, and any other information deemed necessary for evaluation of the criteria pursuant to subdivision (f).

(d) (1) University of California campuses, California State University campuses, and community college districts shall submit their applications to their respective administering entities.

(2) Applications for intersegmental projects shall be
 submitted to each of the administering entities overseeing a campus or college involved in the intersegmental project.

(3) Community college districts and intersegmental partners that receive planning grants may submit applications for construction grants to their respective administering entities only after feasibility studies and all other preliminary planning have been completed and reliable project cost estimates have been developed.

(e) The administering entities shall provide the Department of Finance, the Legislative Analyst’s Office, and the budget committees of the Legislature with information on all submitted project proposals, including, but not limited to, the information specified in subdivision (g), on or before February 1 preceding the fiscal year in which program funds
 are appropriated.

(f) Submitted proposals shall demonstrate all of the following:

(1) Construction on the project could begin by December 31 in the year the grant is awarded, or by the earliest possible date thereafter.

(2) (A) The rent provided in the applicable units of the development for low-income students shall be calculated at 30 percent of 50 percent of the area median income for a single-room occupancy unit type. The percentage of area median income may be adjusted upon written notification by the Director of Finance to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, and approval by the Joint Legislative Budget Committee.

(B) Annual rent for the units described in this paragraph may be adjusted each year based on the lesser of the
 area median income calculation for a given year pursuant to subparagraph (A), or the percentage change in the annual average value of the California Consumer Price Index for all urban consumers for the most recent calendar year of actual data.

(C) The affordability restriction described in subparagraph (A) shall apply for the life of the facility.

(3) A commitment to first offer the housing available from the facilities to low-income students. In meeting this requirement, a campus may calculate the rental savings and number of low-income students that would be served by the student housing constructed pursuant to this section, and place the calculated number of students qualifying for the reduced rental rate throughout the campus’s available housing.

(4) (A) A commitment to require any students
 renting housing in the facilities to take a minimum average of 12 degree-applicable units per semester term, or the quarterly equivalent, to facilitate timely degree completion.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), eligible students renting housing in the facilities shall be permitted to live in the facilities for the full academic or calendar year so long as the student remains enrolled in the applicable campus. Renewal of housing in the facility in subsequent academic or calendar years shall require the student to demonstrate compliance with subparagraph (A).

(C) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), students renting housing in the facilities may temporarily reduce their unit load below 12 degree-applicable units if they are able to demonstrate an exceptional circumstance necessitating a reduced unit load, which may include, but is not
 limited to, illness or injury, as determined by the applicable campus.

(5) Receipt of a grant pursuant to this chapter will result in a public benefit, such as providing low-cost student housing and reduced rents, reducing students’ total cost of attendance, serving more low-income students, or other tangible benefits that would not be practical without the grant for student housing.

(6) The University of California and the California State University shall not use a public-private partnership to construct, operate, maintain, or any combination thereof, a project.

(7) As a condition of receiving funding for a project, the University of California shall comply, with respect to the project, with the requirements of Section 92495 applicable to capital outlay projects.

(8) A plan to build funds into the submitted project bid for project contingency.

(A) The amount for project contingency shall be 5 percent of construction costs for University of California and California State University projects and 10 percent of construction costs for California Community College projects. Intersegmental projects involving a California Community College shall include project contingency of 10 percent of construction costs. Grant funds may be used to cover these project contingency amounts.
